Tennessee, session 114, SB0447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-9-216, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (h) and redesignating the existing subsection (h) accordingly:
(h) It is a violation of this chapter, subject to the penalties in § 69-9-219, for a
person to:
(1) Engage in an activity, including fishing, that inhibits the use of a public
access area or launching area for a period of time beyond that associated with
the customary launching and retrieval of recreational boats; or
(2) Swim, fish, or engage in another activity that interferes with the
intended use of a dock or causes damage to a dock, boat, or marina.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0447
002529
- 1 -